Utah statutes.
31A-22-306.   Personal injury protection.
Personal injury protection under Subsection 31A-22-302(2) provides the
coverages and benefits described under Section 31A-22-307 to persons described
under Section 31A-22-308, but is subject to the limitations, exclusions, and
conditions set forth in Section 31A-22-309.
